Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.9915, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) new text begin "Authorized area" means those counties in the metropolitan area in which, at the 2026 general election, a majority of the voters in each county who vote on the question to impose the regional transportation sales tax, vote in favor of imposition of the tax. Inclusion in or exclusion from the authorized area is determined separately for each county based on the voters in each county.new text end new text begin (c) new text end "Metropolitan area" means the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Metropolitan Council" or "council" means the Metropolitan Council established by section 473.123. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Regional transportation sales tax" means the regional transportation sales and use tax imposed under this section. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.9915, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Sales tax imposition; rate. new text begin (a) Until December 31, 2026, and new text end notwithstanding section 473.123, subdivision 1, the Metropolitan Council must impose a regional transportation sales and use tax at a rate of three-quarters of one percent on retail sales and uses taxable under this chapter made in the metropolitan area or to a destination in the metropolitan area. new text begin (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, and notwithstanding section 473.123, subdivision 1, the Metropolitan Council must impose a regional transportation sales and use tax at a rate of three-quarters of one percent on retail sales and uses taxable under this chapter made in the authorized area or to a destination in the authorized area. new text end